Utah statutes.
46-4-106.   Construction and application.

This chapter must be construed and applied:

(1)  to facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2)  to be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3)  to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among the states enacting it.



Enacted by Chapter 74, 2000 General Session

